Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-923
Cooperative program delivery, defined.

Cooperative program delivery shall mean the provision for two or more systems, areas, or institutions to participate in the planning or delivery of a program or service in a specific or general area; with one system, area, or institution having administrative and academic responsibility for the program.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 7.